New York, session 2025-2026, S3751.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any rule or 2 regulation to the contrary, any educational institution which has an 3 endowment of over ten billion dollars, and which is located in a city 4 with a population of one million or more, shall incorporate thirty 5 percent affordable housing units, as defined by subparagraph (xv) of 6 paragraph (a) of subdivision 16 of section 421-a of the real property 7 tax law, in any property owned by such institution which provides any 8 form of housing. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08129-01-5